Washington statutes.
RCW 43.235.050

Immunity from liability.

If acting in good faith, without malice, and within the parameters of this chapter and the protocols established, representatives of the coordinating entity and the statewide and regional domestic violence fatality review panels are immune from civil liability for an activity related to reviews of particular fatalities.

[ 2012 c 223 s 7; 2000 c 50 s 5.]